src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! To do / Problems
!! ================
!! Tagging transitive and intransitive verbs.
!!      - Difference between св_нп_1a and св_1a?
!!      - нп = intransitive in ALL meanings.(i.e. lack of нп does not always signify transitivity, rather only the possibility of it). Which lemmas are ONLY transitive?
!! Manually check for consistency on issues such as:
!!      - passive forms for transitive imperfectives
!!      - present passives
!!      - past passives
!!      - impersonal tags
! POTENTIAL FORMS
! ===============
! Infinitive            (+Inf)
! Past                  (+Pst)
! Past verbal adverb    (+PstAct+Adv)
! Present               (+Prs)
! Present verbal adverb (+Pres+Adv)
! Future                (+Fut)
! Subjunctive           (+Subj) (included in Past tense lexicons)
! Imperative1           (+Imp+Pl1)
! Imperative2           ()
! Present active ppl
! Present passive ppl
! Past active ppl
! Past passive ppl
! Lexicalized		(+Lxc)
! Derived		(+Drv)
! ======= (the following are formed from transitive impf only)
! Passive Infinitive            (+Inf)
! Passive Past                  (+Pst)
! Passive Present               (+Prs)
! Passive Future                (+Fut)
! Passive Subjunctive           (+Subj)
! Passive Past "active" ppl
! Passive Present "active" ppl

!====================================== Stem type 1 ======================================
!                                       читать, etc.
! 1A has present passive ppl

LEXICON нсв_1a
нсв_нп_1a ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:е PresPass ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_1a/6a_14_ать
:а нсв_нп_1a ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs: PresFut_1_mut_stem_Fac ;
+V+Impf+IV:%^M%<у PresAct_Fac ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_6a/1a_14_ать
+V+Impf+IV:а Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs:а PresFut_1_stem_Fac ;
+V+Impf+IV:а%<у PresAct_Fac ;
+V+Impf+IV:а Imper_unstressed ;
+V+Impf+IV:а PresVrbAdv_stem ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs: PresFut_1_mut_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV:%^M%<у PresAct ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_6a/1a_14_а́ть
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs:а́ PresFut_1_stem_Fac ;
+V+Impf+IV:а́%<у PresAct_Fac ;
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Imper_unstressed ;
+V+Impf+IV:а́ PresVrbAdv_stem ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs: PresFut_1_mut_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV:%^M%<у PresAct ;

LEXICON нсв_1a/6a_14_ать_R
:а нсв_1a_R ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs: PresFut_1_mut_stem_R_Fac ;
+V+Impf+IV:%^M%<у PresAct_R_Fac ;

LEXICON нсв_6a/1as_14_а́ть
нсв_нп_6a/1a_14_а́ть ;
+V+Impf+TV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs:а́ PresFut_1_stem_Fac ;
+V+Impf+TV:а́%<у PresAct_Fac ;
+V+Impf+TV:а́ Imper_unstressed ;
+V+Impf+TV:а́ PresVrbAdv_stem ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs: PresFut_1_mut_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV:%^M%<у PresAct ;
+V+Impf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem_Prb ;

LEXICON нсв_6a/1a_14_а́ть_R
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs:а́ PresFut_1_stem_R_Fac ;
+V+Impf+IV:а́%<у PresAct_R_Fac ;
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Imper_unstressed_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:а́ PresVrbAdv_stem_R ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs: PresFut_1_mut_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:%^M%<у PresAct_R ;

LEXICON нсв_1a_страд._нет
нсв_нп_1a ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_1a_pp
нсв_1a ;
+V+Impf+TV: PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_1a_pp_а́ть
:а́ нсв_нп_1a ;
+V+Impf+TV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:а́ Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:а́е PresPass ;
+V+Impf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_1a_безл.
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Inf_V_stem_безл. ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_безл. ;

LEXICON нсв_1a_в_лит._языке_наст._и_буд._нет ! TODO FST can't block synthetic future (i.e. from infinitive)
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_Prb ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass_Prb ;
+V+Impf+TV:е PresPass_Prb ;

LEXICON нсв_1a_R
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON нсв_1a_R_обязываться
+V+Impf+IV:ыва Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>у́ Impf_Pres_1_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:ыва Impf_Pres_1_stem_R_Fac ;

LEXICON нсв_1a_R_безл.
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_stem_R_безл. ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_R_безл. ;

LEXICON нсв_1as
нсв_нп_1a ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:е PresPass ;
+V+Impf+TV: PastPass_нн_stem_Prb ;               ! TODO POSSIBLY WRONG STRESS HERE

LEXICON нсв_1a?
нсв_нп_1a ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:е PresPass ;

LEXICON нсв_1a?_многокр.                        ! ITERATIVE TODO: do we need to tag these?
нсв_нп_1a ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:е PresPass ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_1a
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_1a_безл.
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_V_stem_безл. ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_безл. ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_1a_имеется_страд.
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+IV:е PresPass ;

LEXICON нсв_[но_в_прош._и_инф._также_св]_1a
нсв_1a ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_Fac ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_Fac ;

LEXICON нсв_[но_в_прош._и_инф._также_св]_1a_R
нсв_1a_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_R_Fac ;

LEXICON св_1a
св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_1a/6a_14_ать_R
:а св_1a_R ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut: PresFut_1_mut_stem_R_Fac ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1+Fac:%^M%<емся # ;

LEXICON св_нп_1a/6a_14_ать
:а св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut: PresFut_1_mut_stem_Fac ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1+Fac:%^M%<ем # ;

LEXICON св_6a/1a_14_ать
св_6a/1as_14_ать ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_6a/1as_14_а́ть
св_нп_6a/1a_14_а́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV+Fut:а́ PresFut_1_stem_Fac ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Imper_unstressed ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1+Fac:а́%<ем # ;
+V+Perf+TV+Fut: PresFut_1_mut_stem ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:%^M%<ем # ;

LEXICON св_6a/1as_14_ать
св_нп_6a/1a_14_ать ;
+V+Perf+TV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV+Fut:а PresFut_1_stem_Fac ;
+V+Perf+TV:а Imper_unstressed ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1+Fac:а%<ем # ;
+V+Perf+TV+Fut: PresFut_1_mut_stem ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:%^M%<ем # ;

LEXICON св_нп_6a/1a_14_ать
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut:а PresFut_1_stem_Fac ;
+V+Perf+IV:а Imper_unstressed ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1+Fac:а%<ем # ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut: PresFut_1_mut_stem ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:%^M%<ем # ;

LEXICON св_нп_6a/1a_14_а́ть
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut:а́ PresFut_1_stem_Fac ;
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Imper_unstressed ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1+Fac:а́%<ем # ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut: PresFut_1_mut_stem ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:%^M%<ем # ;

LEXICON св_6a/1a_14_а́ть_R
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut:а́ PresFut_1_stem_R_Fac ;
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Imper_unstressed_R ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1+Fac:а́%<емся # ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut: PresFut_1_mut_stem_R ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:%^M%<емся # ;

LEXICON св_1a_R
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_1a_R_безл.
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_stem_R_безл. ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_R_безл. ;

LEXICON св-нсв_1a_R
нсв_1a_R ;
св_1a_R ;

LEXICON св_1a_R_буд._в_лит._языке_нет
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_R_Prb ;

LEXICON св_нп_1a
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_1a_безл.
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_stem_безл. ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_безл. ;

LEXICON св_1a_а́ть
:а́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св-нсв_1a_а́ть
:а́ нсв_1a ;
св_1a_а́ть ;

LEXICON св_1a?
св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св-нсв_1a?
нсв_1a? ;
св_1a? ;

LEXICON св_1a?_буд._в_лит._языке_нет
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_Prb ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_Prb ;

LEXICON св_1as
св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: PastPass_нн_stem_Prb ;
