src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
перемуравливать:перемура́влива нсв_1a ;
высучивать:высу́чива нсв_1a ;
донимать:донима́ нсв_1a "weight: 1.9732849167398068" ;
видать:вида́ нсв_1a_в_лит._языке_наст._и_буд._нет "weight: 3.6264974305151503" ; ! (наст._менее_литературно,_чем_прочие_формы)
брызгаться:бры́зг нсв_1a/6a_14_ать_R "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
двигаться:дви́г нсв_1a/6a_14_ать_R "weight: 4.059135907893073" ;
колыхаться:колы́х нсв_6a/1a_14_а́ть_R "weight: 2.653231683762395" ;
выбеливаться:выбе́лива нсв_1a_R ;
обкашиваться:обка́шива нсв_1a_R ;
тетёшкаться:тетёшка нсв_1a_R ;
икаться:ика́ нсв_1a_R_безл. ;
желаться:жела́ нсв_1a_R_безл. ;
мечтаться:мечта́ нсв_1a_R_безл. ;
обязываться:обя́з нсв_1a_R_обязываться ;
колыхать:колы́х нсв_6a/1as_14_а́ть "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
подхолаживать:подхола́жива нсв_1a_безл. ;
познабливать:позна́блива нсв_1a_безл. ;
поламывать:пола́мыва нсв_1a_безл. ;
слыхать:слыха́ нсв_1a_в_лит._языке_наст._и_буд._нет "weight: 2.7716395532117373" ;
знать:зна́ нсв_1a_страд._нет "weight: 4.3586357981038235" ;
иметь:име́ нсв_1a_страд._нет "weight: 5.024409864058958" ;
надевать:надёв нсв_1a_pp_а́ть "weight: 2.696388600792545" ;
седлать:сёдл нсв_1a_pp_а́ть "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
верстать:вёрст нсв_1a_pp_а́ть "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
повинчивать:пови́нчива нсв_1a? ;
поджидать:поджида́ нсв_1a? "weight: 2.899038888367694" ;
служивать:слу́жива нсв_1a?_многокр. ;
слыхивать:слы́хива нсв_1a?_многокр. "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
корнать:корна́ нсв_1as ;
пулять:пуля́ нсв_1as "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
девать:дева́ нсв_[но_в_прош._и_инф._также_св]_1a "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
деваться:дева́ нсв_[но_в_прош._и_инф._также_св]_1a_R "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
отседать:отседа́ нсв_нп_1a ;
хлипать:хли́па нсв_нп_1a ;
капризничать:капри́знича нсв_нп_1a "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
алкать:а́лк нсв_нп_6a/1a_14_а́ть "weight: 2.499254738997286" ;
рыскать:ры́ск нсв_нп_6a/1a_14_ать "weight: 2.439940737781304" ;
капать:ка́п нсв_нп_1a/6a_14_ать "weight: 2.7136476062340504" ;
крапать:кра́п нсв_нп_1a/6a_14_ать "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
разведривать:разве́дрива нсв_нп_1a_безл. ;
рассветать:рассвета́ нсв_нп_1a_безл. "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
отомщать:отомща́ нсв_нп_1a_имеется_страд. ;
управлять:управля́ нсв_нп_1a_имеется_страд. "weight: 3.9667211472374184" ;
зачиркать:зачи́рка св_1a ;
зацарапать:зацара́па св_1a ;
обрыскать:обры́ск св_6a/1a_14_ать ;
изрыскать:изры́ск св_6a/1a_14_ать ;
забрызгаться:забры́зг св_1a/6a_14_ать_R ;
побрызгаться:побры́зг св_1a/6a_14_ать_R ;
расколыхаться:расколы́х св_6a/1a_14_а́ть_R "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
всколыхаться:всколы́х св_6a/1a_14_а́ть_R ;
поколыхать:поколы́х св_6a/1as_14_а́ть ;
расколыхать:расколы́х св_6a/1as_14_а́ть ;
окопаться:окопа́ св_1a_R "weight: 2.358635798103824" ;
избродяжничаться:избродя́жнича св_1a_R ;
развиднеться:развидне́ св_1a_R_безл. "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
свечереться:свечере́ св_1a_R_безл. ;
увидаться:увида́ св_1a_R_буд._в_лит._языке_нет ;
потаскать:пота́ск св_1a_а́ть "weight: 2.0032481401172504" ;
покусать:поку́с св_1a_а́ть "weight: 2.489914712743143" ;
повынимать:повынима́ св_1a? ;
угонять:угоня́ св_1a? "weight: 1.9732849167398068" ;
увидать:увида́ св_1a?_буд._в_лит._языке_нет "weight: 1.9411002333684055" ;
услыхать:услыха́ св_1a?_буд._в_лит._языке_нет "weight: 1.7813993905008936" ;
повытряхивать:повытря́хива св_1as ;
прозакладывать:прозакла́дыва св_1as ;
перенервничать:перене́рвнича св_нп_1a "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
отболеть:отболе́ св_нп_1a "weight: 1.6722549210758255" ;
порыскать:поры́ск св_нп_6a/1a_14_ать ;
прорыскать:проры́ск св_нп_6a/1a_14_ать ;
прокапать:прока́п св_нп_1a/6a_14_ать ;
покрапать:покра́п св_нп_1a/6a_14_ать ;
похолоднеть:похолодне́ св_нп_1a_безл. ;
выяснеть:вы́ясне св_нп_1a_безл. ;
венчаться:венча́ св-нсв_1a_R "weight: 1.8685495662197937" ;
обещаться:обеща́ св-нсв_1a_R "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
обещать:обе́щ св-нсв_1a_а́ть "weight: 4.127099781084335" ;
завещать:заве́щ св-нсв_1a_а́ть "weight: 2.944428176717333" ;
стяжать:стяжа́ св-нсв_1a? "weight: 2.304278135781231" ;
сочетать:сочета́ св-нсв_1a? "weight: 3.40234472598923" ;
